District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.54

Dismissal.

(a)

The Superior Court shall dismiss a derivative proceeding on motion by the corporation if one of the groups specified in subsection (b) or subsection (e) of this section has determined in good faith, after conducting a reasonable inquiry upon which its conclusions are based, that the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is not in the best interests of the corporation.

(b)

Unless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, the determination in subsection (a) of this section shall be made by a majority vote of:

(1)

Qualified directors present at a meeting of the board of directors if the qualified directors constitute a quorum; or

(2)

A committee consisting of 2 or more qualified directors appointed by majority vote of qualified directors present at a meeting of the board of directors, regardless of whether the qualified directors constitute a quorum.

(c)

If a derivative proceeding is commenced after a determination has been made rejecting a demand by a shareholder, the complaint shall allege with particularity facts establishing that:

(1)

A majority of the board of directors did not consist of qualified directors at the time the determination was made; or

(2)

The requirements of subsection (a) of this section have not been met.

(d)

If a majority of the board of directors consisted of qualified directors at the time the determination was made, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have not been met. Otherwise, the corporation has the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have been met.

(e)

Upon motion by the corporation, the Superior Court may appoint a panel of one or more individuals to make a determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the best interests of the corporation. In such case, the plaintiff has the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have not been met.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-301.21.